dictionaries/be_BY/src/hunspell/be-BY.aff
SET UTF-8

IGNORE ́̀

TRY аяоёйцукжеэнгшўзхіыпрлдюьбвтмсчфАЯОЁЙЦУКЖЕЭНГШЎЗХІЫПРЛДЮЬБВТМСЧФ'

WORDCHARS -'’`

ICONV 2
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ` '

REP 20
REP a а       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP b б       # OCR/Typing error (capital cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP c с       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP e е       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP h н       # OCR/Typing error (capital cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP i і       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP k к       # OCR/Typing error (capital cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP m м       # OCR/Typing error (capital cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP o о       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP p р       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP t т       # OCR/Typing error (capital cyrilic and latin are different letters)  
REP x х       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP y у       # OCR/Typing error (cyrilic and latin are different letters)
REP щ ці      # OCR error        (no щ in belarusian)
REP щ шч      # Typing error     (no щ in belarusian)
REP ъ '       # Typing error     (no ъ in belarusian)
REP е ё       # Typing error     (е - ё replacement)
REP ё е       # Typiпg error     (ё - е replacement)
REP н е       # Typiпg error     (н - e neighbor letters)
REP у к       # Typiпg error     (у - к neighbor letters)


FLAG num

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1 у ў у


SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 -я-яй -я-яй .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 -я-яй я-яй .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 я я .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 я і .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 я ю .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 я яй .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 я яю .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 ы ы .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 ы ага .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 ы аму .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 ы ым .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 ы ае .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 ы ая .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 ы ай .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 ы ую .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 ы аю .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 ы ыя .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 ы ых .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 ы ымі .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 й й .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 й я .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 й ю .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 й ем .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 й і .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 а .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 у .
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 ам .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 е .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 ы .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 аў .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 амі .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 ах .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 т т .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 т ту .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 т там .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 т це .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 т ты .
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 т таў .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 т тамі .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 т тах .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 ь ь .
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 ь і .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 ь нню .
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 і і .
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 і ага .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 і аму .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 і ім .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 і ае .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 і ая .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 і ай .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 і ую .
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 і аю .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 і ія .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 і іх .
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 і імі .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 а а .
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 а ы .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 а у .
SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61 а ай .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 а аю .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 а 0 .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 а ам .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 а амі .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 а ах .
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 ак ак .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 ак ка .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 ак ку .
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 ак кам .
SFX 71 Y 1
SFX 71 ак кі .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 ак каў .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 ак камі .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 ак ках .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 ы а .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 і аў .
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 і ам .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 і амі .
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 і ах .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 зе .
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 е е .
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 е я .
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 е ю .
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 е ем .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 е і .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 цца цца .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 цца ецца .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 цца юцца .
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 цца ўся .
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 цца лася .
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 цца ліся .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 ць ць .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 ць ю .
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 ць еш .
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 ць е .
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 ць ем .
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 ць еце .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 ць юць .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 ць ў .
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 ць ла .
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 ць лі .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 ць й .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 ць йце .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 ць ючы .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 іцца іцца .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 іцца яцца .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 іцца іўся .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 іцца ілася .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 іцца іліся .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 зіць зіць .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 зіць жу .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 зіць зіш .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 зіць зім .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 зіць зіце .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 зіць зяць .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 зіць зіў .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 зіць зіла .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 зіць зілі .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 зіць зі .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 зіць зіўшы .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 ка ка .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 ка кі .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 ка цы .
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 ка ку .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 ка кай .
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126 ка каю .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 ка ак .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 ка кам .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 ка камі .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 ка ках .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 і .
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 езны езны .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 езны езнага .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 езны езнаму .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 езны езным .
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 езны езнае .
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 езны езная .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 езны езнай .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 езны езную .
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 езны езнаю .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 езны езныя .
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 езны езных .
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 езны езнымі .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 езны язны .
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 езны язнога .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 езны язному .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 езны язным .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 езны язное .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 езны язная .
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 езны язной .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 езны язную .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 езны язною .
SFX 153 Y 1
SFX 153 езны язныя .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 езны язных .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 езны язнымі .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 т та .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 авацца авацца .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 авацца уецца .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 авацца уюцца .
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 авацца аваўся .
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 авацца авалася .
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 авацца аваліся .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 аваць аваць .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 аваць ую .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 аваць уеш .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 аваць уе .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 аваць уем .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 аваць уеце .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 аваць уюць .
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 аваць аваў .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 аваць авала .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 аваць авалі .
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 аваць уючы .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 аваць аваўшы .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 ь ю .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 аваць уй .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 аваць уйце .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 ў ў .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 ў ва .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 ў ву .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 ў вам .
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 ў ве .
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 ў вы .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 ў ваў .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 ў вамі .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 ў вах .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 а ей .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 есці есці .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 есці ем .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 есці ясі .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 есці есць .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 есці ядзім .
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 есці ясце .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 есці ядуць .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 есці еў .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 есці ела .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 есці елі .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 есці еш .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 есці ешце .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 есці еж .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 есці ежце .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 есці еўшы .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 есціся есціся .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 есціся емся .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 есціся ясіся .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 есціся есца .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 есціся ядзімся .
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 есціся ясцеся .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 есціся ядуцца .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 есціся еўся .
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 есціся елася .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 есціся еліся .
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 есціся еўшыся .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 хаць хаць .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 хаць ду .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 хаць дзеш .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 хаць дзе .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 хаць дзем .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 хаць дзеце .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 хаць дуць .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 хаць хаў .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 хаць хала .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 хаць халі .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 хаць дзь .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 хаць дзьце .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 хаць хаўшы .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 ць ўшы .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 ва ва .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 ва вы .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 ва ве .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 ва ву .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 ва вай .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 ва ваю .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 ва ў .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 ва вам .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 ва вамі .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 ва вах .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 віцца віцца .
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 віцца ўлюся .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 віцца вішся .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 віцца вімся .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 віцца віцеся .
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 віцца вяцца .
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 віцца віўся .
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 віцца вілася .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 віцца віліся .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 віцца віся .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 віцца віўшыся .
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 віць віць .
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 віць ўлю .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 віць віш .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 віць вім .
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 віць віце .
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 віць вяць .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 віць віў .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 віць віла .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 віць вілі .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 віць ві .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 віць віўшы .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 а е .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 цца юся .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 цца ешся .
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 цца емся .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 цца ецеся .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 цца йся .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 цца йцеся .
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 цца ючыся .
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 е яў .
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 е ям .
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 е ямі .
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 е ях .
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 цца ўшыся .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 абегчы абегчы .
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 абегчы ягу .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 абегчы яжыш .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 абегчы яжыць .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 абегчы яжым .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 абегчы ежыце .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 абегчы ягуць .
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 абегчы абег .
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 абегчы абегла .
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 абегчы абеглі .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 абегчы яжы .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 абегчы яжыце .
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 абегчы абегшы .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 абегчы абягу .
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 абегчы абяжыш .
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 абегчы абяжыць .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 абегчы абяжым .
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 абегчы абежыце .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 абегчы абягуць .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 абегчы абяжы .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 абегчы абяжыце .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 іцца люся .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 іцца ішся .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 іцца імся .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 іцца іцеся .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 іцца ся .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 іцца цеся .
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 іцца іўшыся .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 іцца 'юся .
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 іцца 'ешся .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 іцца 'ецца .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 іцца 'ёмся .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 іцца 'яцеся .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 іцца 'юцца .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 іцца іся .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 іць іць .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 іць 'ю .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 іць 'еш .
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 іць 'е .
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 іць 'ём .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 іць 'яце .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 іць 'юць .
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 іць іў .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 іць іла .
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 іць ілі .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 іць і .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 іць іце .
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 іць іўшы .
SFX 321 Y 1
SFX 321 абрацца абрацца .
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 абрацца яруся .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 абрацца ярэшся .
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 абрацца ярэцца .
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 абрацца яромся .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 абрацца ерацеся .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 абрацца яруцца .
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 абрацца раўся .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 абрацца ралася .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 абрацца раліся .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 абрацца раўшыся .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 абрацца абяруся .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 абрацца абярэшся .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 абрацца абярэцца .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 абрацца абяромся .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 абрацца аберацеся .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 абрацца абяруцца .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 абрацца абраўся .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 абрацца абралася .
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 абрацца абраліся .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 абрацца абярыся .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 абрацца абярыцеся .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 абрацца абраўшыся .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 абраць абраць .
